Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB88.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 278 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Extreme weather conditions" means a:
1. Day for which the National Weather Service has issued either an
Extreme Cold Warning or Extreme Heat Warning for the county in
which the customer resides; or
2. Period of natural disaster in the county in which the customer resides.
As used in this subparagraph, "natural disaster" means any natural
disaster resulting in the declaration of a state of emergency under
KRS 39A.100 or 39B.070; and
(b) "Utility" has the same meaning as in KRS 278.010(3)(a) and (b).
(2) Each utility shall submit an extreme weather disconnection plan to the
commission. The extreme weather disconnection plan shall identify how the
utility will prevent disconnection or suspension of residential service for
nonpayment to the customer during extreme weather conditions.
(3) The commission shall:
(a) Make available each utility's extreme weather disconnection plan on the
commission's website; and
(b) Order each utility with an extreme weather disconnection plan to make its
extreme weather disconnection plan available on its utility website.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/14/2026 1:49 PM Jacketed